Utah statutes.
10-6-124.   Transfer of appropriation balance between accounts -- Excess
expenditure within departments.
With the consent of the budget officer, or the approval in charter cities as
required by charter, the head of any department may transfer any unencumbered
or unexpended appropriation balance or any portion thereof from one
expenditure account to another within the department during the budget period,
or an excess expenditure of one or more line items may be permitted by any
department head with the consent of the budget officer, or his equivalent in
charter cities, provided the total of all excess expenditures or encumbrances
do not exceed total unused appropriations within the department at the close
of the budget period.
